Utah statutes.
61-2a-8.   Insufficient funds to satisfy judgments -- Procedure and
interest.
If the money deposited in the fund and allotted for satisfying judgments
against licensees is insufficient to satisfy any authorized claim for payment,
the division shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the fund,
satisfy the unpaid claims in the order that they were originally filed,
together with accumulated interest at the rate of 8% per annum.
